New Jersey, session 222, A1522.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall adopt regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), implementing the following reductions in required on- and off-street parking spaces in the Statewide site improvement standards: (1)  a 20 percent reduction in required parking spaces between one mile and one-half mile of: (a)   public transportation service; (b)  five or more motorbus regular routes operated pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.); or (c)   a roadway within a municipality with at least 15 roadside bus stops for motorbus regular routes operated pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.); (2)  a 30 percent reduction in required parking spaces between one-half mile and one-quarter mile of: (a)   public transportation service; (b)  five or more motorbus regular routes operated pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.); or (c)   a roadway within a municipality with at least 15 roadside bus stops for motorbus regular routes operated pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.); (3)  a 50 percent reduction in required parking spaces within one-quarter mile of: (a)   public transportation service; (b)  five or more motorbus regular routes operated pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.); or (c)   a roadway within a municipality with at least 15 roadside bus stops for motorbus regular routes operated pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.). b.    As used in this section: Ferry passenger service shall have the same meaning as provided in subsection h. of subsection 3 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-3); Motorbus regular route service shall have the same meaning as provided in subsection b. of section 3 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-3); Public transportation service means rail passenger service and motorbus regular route service stations and terminals operated by the New Jersey Transit Corporation, established pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.), and ferry passenger service terminals. Rail passenger service shall have the same meaning as provided in subsection g. of section 3 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-3). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.